District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.04

Director; appointment, compensation.

(a)

The DDOE shall be headed by a Director who shall:

(1)

Be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council, pursuant to § 1-523.01(a);

(2)

Be a person qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of the office; and

(3)

Serve at the pleasure of the Mayor.

(b)

The Mayor shall fix the compensation of the Director pursuant to subchapter X-A of Chapter 6 of Title 1.

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 104, 52 DCR 10812
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 104, 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction in (b).